Utah statutes.
73-3-7.   Protests.

(1)  Any person interested may file a protest with the state engineer:

(a)  within 20 days after the notice is published, if the adjudicative proceeding is informal; and

(b)  within 30 days after the notice is published, if the adjudicative proceeding is formal.

(2)  The state engineer shall consider the protest and shall approve or reject the application.

